Ohio, session 136, HB368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 1923.111 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 1923.111. (A) All records of actions commenced under 6
this chapter shall be automatically sealed by the clerk of the 7
court's office three years after the final judgment entry in the 8
case or, if any financial judgment was awarded, three years 9
after the date of final satisfaction of the judgment. 10
(B) Any records of actions eligible to be sealed under 11
division (A) of this section shall be automatically sealed by 12
the clerk of the court's office within ninety days after the 13
effective date of this section. 14